Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.090

Brand is personal property—Instruments affecting title, recording, effect—Fee—Nonliability of director for agents.

A brand is the personal property of the owner of record. Any instrument affecting the title of the brand shall be executed by the recorded owner and acknowledged by a notary public. The director shall record the instrument upon presentation and payment of a recording fee of twenty-five dollars. The recording shall be constructive notice to all the world of the existence and conditions affecting the title to the brand. A copy of all records concerning the brand, certified by the director, shall be received in evidence to all intent and purposes as the original instrument. The director shall not be personally liable for failure of the director's agents to properly record the instrument.

[ 2003 c 326 s 11; 1994 c 46 s 17; 1993 c 354 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 64 s 3; 1965 c 66 s 2; 1959 c 54 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.